Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20209-631.02
Keno writer; exemption from licensure.

A person who
is a keno writer and has no direct responsibility for the selection of numbers
shall not be considered a lottery worker and shall not be required to be licensed
for purposes of the Nebraska County and City Lottery Act.

Laws 2014, LB259, § 5.